Washington statutes.
RCW 34.08.020

Washington State Register—Created—Publication period—Contents.

There is hereby created a state publication to be called the Washington State Register, which shall be published on no less than a monthly basis. The register shall contain, but is not limited to, the following materials received by the code reviser's office during the pertinent publication period:

(1)(a) The full text of any proposed new or amendatory rule, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, and the citation of any existing rules the repeal of which is proposed, prior to the public hearing on such proposal. Such material shall be considered, when published, to be the official notification of the intended action, and no state agency or official thereof may take action on any such rule except on emergency rules adopted in accordance with RCW 34.05.350, until twenty days have passed since the distribution date of the register in which the rule and hearing notice have been published or a notice regarding the omission of the rule has been published pursuant to RCW 34.05.210(4) as now or hereafter amended;

(b) The small business economic impact statement, if required by RCW 19.85.030, preceding the full text of the proposed new or amendatory rule;

(2) The full text of any new or amendatory rule adopted, and the citation of any existing rule repealed, on a permanent or emergency basis;

(3) Executive orders and emergency declarations of the governor;

(4) Public meeting notices of any and all agencies of state government, including state elected officials whose offices are created by Article III of the state Constitution or RCW 48.02.010;

(5) Rules of the state supreme court which have been adopted but not yet published in an official permanent codification;

(6) Summaries of attorney general opinions and letter opinions, noting the number, date, subject, and other information, and prepared by the attorney general for inclusion in the register;

(7) Juvenile disposition standards and security guidelines proposed and adopted under RCW 13.40.030;

(8) Proposed and adopted rules of the commission on judicial conduct;

(9) The maximum allowable rates of interest and retail installment contract service charges filed by the state treasurer under RCW 19.52.025 and * 63.14.135. In addition, the highest rate of interest permissible for the current month and the maximum retail installment contract service charge for the current year shall be published in each issue of the register. The publication of the maximum allowable interest rate established pursuant to RCW 19.52.025 shall be accompanied by the following advisement: NOTICE: FEDERAL LAW PERMITS FEDERALLY INSURED FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS IN THE STATE TO CHARGE THE HIGHEST RATE OF INTEREST THAT MAY BE CHARGED BY ANY FINANCIAL INSTITUTION IN THE STATE. THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE RATE OF INTEREST SET FORTH ABOVE MAY NOT APPLY TO A PARTICULAR TRANSACTION; and

(10) A list of corporations dissolved during the preceding month filed by the secretary of state under chapter 23B.14 RCW.

[ 1995 c 47 s 9; 1987 c 186 s 8; 1986 c 60 s 3; 1983 c 2 s 8. Prior: 1982 c 6 s 6; 1981 c 299 s 18; 1980 c 186 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 63.14.135 was repealed by 1995 c 249 s 1.

Severability—1983 c 2: See note following RCW 18.71.030.

Severability—1980 c 186: See note following RCW 34.05.320.

Schedule of regular meetings of state agencies: RCW 42.30.075.